Hawaii statutes.
[§200-5] Commercial harbors excluded. For
purposes of this chapter, ocean waters and navigable streams shall not include
the commercial harbors of the State. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next